Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7816.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Coverage denial justification and notification.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a pharmacy benefit manager as defined in
§ 27-18-33.2 shall not deny coverage for a prescription drug without first providing a written notice
containing a medically sound justification for the denial, delivered simultaneously to both the
prescribing provider and the patient. The notice shall include sufficient detail to permit the provider
and patient to understand the basis for denial and, if appropriate, submit an appeal or request for
prior authorization.
(1) Medical oversight requirement. Any medically sound justification required under this
section must be provided or reviewed by a licensed physician, licensed pharmacist, or other health
care professional authorized under Rhode Island law to provide such clinical determinations, and
the name and license information of the reviewing professional must be included in the written
notice.
(2) Definition of medically sound justification. For purposes of this section, "medically
sound justification" means a reason based on recognized clinical standards or evidence-based
guidelines appropriate to the patient’s condition.
(3) Plan compliance. Nothing in this section shall prevent a pharmacy benefit manager
from denying coverage in accordance with the terms of the insurance plan or prescription drug

benefit contract; provided that, the written justification requirement and medical oversight
requirements are met.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Coverage denial justification and notification.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a pharmacy benefit manager as defined in
§ 27-19-26.2 shall not deny coverage for a prescription drug without first providing a written notice
containing a medically sound justification for the denial, delivered simultaneously to both the
prescribing provider and the patient. The notice shall include sufficient detail to permit the provider
and patient to understand the basis for denial and, if appropriate, submit an appeal or request for
prior authorization.
(1) Medical oversight requirement. Any medically sound justification required under this
section must be provided or reviewed by a licensed physician, licensed pharmacist, or other health
care professional authorized under Rhode Island law to provide such clinical determinations, and
the name and license information of the reviewing professional must be included in the written
notice.
(2) Definition of medically sound justification. For purposes of this section, "medically
sound justification" means a reason based on recognized clinical standards or evidence-based
guidelines appropriate to the patient’s condition.
(3) Plan compliance. Nothing in this section shall prevent a pharmacy benefit manager
from denying coverage in accordance with the terms of the insurance plan or prescription drug
benefit contract; provided that, the written justification requirement and medical oversight
requirements are met.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Coverage denial justification and notification.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a pharmacy benefit manager as defined in
§ 27-20-23.2 shall not deny coverage for a prescription drug without first providing a written notice
containing a medically sound justification for the denial, delivered simultaneously to both the
prescribing provider and the patient. The notice shall include sufficient detail to permit the provider
and patient to understand the basis for denial and, if appropriate, submit an appeal or request for
prior authorization.
(1) Medical oversight requirement. Any medically sound justification required under this
section must be provided or reviewed by a licensed physician, licensed pharmacist, or other health
LC005053 - Page 2 of 4

care professional authorized under Rhode Island law to provide such clinical determinations, and
the name and license information of the reviewing professional must be included in the written
notice.
(2) Definition of medically sound justification. For purposes of this section, "medically
sound justification" means a reason based on recognized clinical standards or evidence-based
guidelines appropriate to the patient’s condition.
(3) Plan compliance. Nothing in this section shall prevent a pharmacy benefit manager
from denying coverage in accordance with the terms of the insurance plan or prescription drug
benefit contract; provided that, the written justification requirement and medical oversight
requirements are met.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Coverage denial justification and notification.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a pharmacy benefit manager as defined in
§ 27-41-38.2 shall not deny coverage for a prescription drug without first providing a written notice
containing a medically sound justification for the denial, delivered simultaneously to both the
prescribing provider and the patient. The notice shall include sufficient detail to permit the provider
and patient to understand the basis for denial and, if appropriate, submit an appeal or request for
prior authorization.
(1) Medical oversight requirement. Any medically sound justification required under this
section must be provided or reviewed by a licensed physician, licensed pharmacist, or other health
care professional authorized under Rhode Island law to provide such clinical determinations, and
the name and license information of the reviewing professional must be included in the written
notice.
(2) Definition of medically sound justification. For purposes of this section, "medically
sound justification" means a reason based on recognized clinical standards or evidence-based
guidelines appropriate to the patient’s condition.
(3) Plan compliance. Nothing in this section shall prevent a pharmacy benefit manager
from denying coverage in accordance with the terms of the insurance plan or prescription drug
benefit contract; provided that, the written justification requirement and medical oversight
requirements are met.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005053
========
LC005053 - Page 3 of 4